Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.005

Defined.

Prosecuting attorneys are attorneys authorized by law to appear for and represent the state and the counties thereof in actions and proceedings before the courts and judicial officers.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.27.005. Prior: 1891 c 55 s 3; RRS s 113.]